South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S408.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the State Board of Financial Institutions, relating to Electronic Fund Transfers, designated as Regulation Document Number 5290, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The State Board of Financial Institutions (BOFI) proposes to repeal Regulation 15-45 as it references an outdated "pilot program" which allowed credit unions to utilize electronic fund transfers; these transfers are now allowed by statute at Section 34-26-410. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 28, 2024. The Proposed Regulation was published in the State Register on August 23, 2024. ----XX----